Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Chapter 20. The Alaska Coordinate System.

Sec. 38.20.010.
Adoption.

The systems of rectangular plane coordinates established by the National Geodetic Survey, National Ocean Service for defining and stating the positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth in this state are adopted. The systems are to be known as the “Alaska Coordinate System of 1927” and the “Alaska Coordinate System of 1983.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am § 55 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Sec. 38.20.020.
Zones.

For the purpose of the use of this system the state is divided into ten zones, numbered 1 — 10, which are defined as follows:

Zone 1: that part of Alaska lying east of meridian 141° 00´ west of Greenwich;

Zone 2: that part of Alaska lying between meridians 141° 00´ and 144° 00´ west of Greenwich;

Zone 3: that part of Alaska lying between meridians 144° 00´ and 148° 00´ west of Greenwich and in addition all of Perry Island and all of Esther Island, but excluding all of Latouche Island, all of Evans Island, and all of the Kenai Peninsula;

Zone 4: that part of Alaska lying between meridians 148° 00´ and 152° 00´ west of Greenwich and in addition all of Latouche Island, all of Evans Island, and all of the Kenai Peninsula, but excluding Marmot Island, all of Afognak Island, all of the Barren Islands, all of Kalgin Island, all of Perry Island, and all of Esther Island;

Zone 5: that part of Alaska lying between meridians 152° 00´ and 156° 00´ west of Greenwich and in addition Marmot Island, all of Afognak Island, all of the Barren Islands, and all of Kalgin Island;

Zone 6: that part of Alaska lying between meridians 156° 00´ and 160° 00´ west of Greenwich and in addition Andronica Island and all of Nagai Island;

Zone 7: that part of Alaska lying between meridians 160° 00´ and 164° 00´ west of Greenwich and in addition all of Unimak Island, but excluding Andronica Island and all of Nagai Island;

Zone 8: that part of Alaska lying between meridians 164° 00´ and 168° 00´ west of Greenwich and in addition King Island, Little Diomede Island, and all of Cape Prince of Wales, but excluding all of the Aleutian Islands;

Zone 9: all islands in the Bering Sea lying west of meridian 168° 00´ west of Greenwich, excluding all of the Aleutian Islands, King Island, and Little Diomede Island;

Zone 10: all of the Aleutian Island group lying west and south of Unimak Pass.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965)

Sec. 38.20.030.
Designation of zones.

In any land description in which a coordinate system is used a zone of the coordinate system is designated the “Alaska Coordinate System of 1927, Zone ....................” or the “Alaska Coordinate System of 1983, Zone ....................”

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am § 56 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Sec. 38.20.040.
Use of coordinate system.

The plane coordinates of a point on the earth’s surface, to be used in expressing the position or location of the point in the appropriate zone of this system, consist of two distances, expressed in feet and decimals of a foot when using the Alaska Coordinate System of 1927 and expressed in meters and decimals of a meter when using the Alaska Coordinate System of 1983. One of these distances, known as the “x-coordinate,” gives the position in an east-and-west direction; the other known as the “y-coordinate” gives the position in a north-and-south direction.
These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to the coordinates of the North American Horizontal Geodetic Control Network as determined by the National Geodetic Survey, National Ocean Service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am § 57 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Sec. 38.20.050.
Land lying in two zones.

When a tract of land to be defined by a single description extends from one coordinate zone into another, the positions of all points on its boundaries may be referred to either of the two zones, the zone which is used being specifically named in the description.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965)

Sec. 38.20.060.
Characteristics of zones.

The zones of the Alaska Coordinate System of 1927 have the following characteristics:

Zone 1 is an oblique Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having an origin at the intersection of parallel 57° 00 minutes north latitude and meridian 133° 40 minutes west of Greenwich, at which the scale is set one part in 10,000 too small, and through which the axis of symmetry is in geodetic azimuth arc tangent-3/4, reckoned clockwise from south. The origin is assigned values such that all final coordinates will be positive.

Zone 2 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 142° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 142° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel of 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 3 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 146° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 146° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 4 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 150° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 150° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 5 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 154° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 154° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 6 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 158° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 158° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 7 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 162° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 162° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 700,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 8 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 166° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 166° west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 9 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 170° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 170° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 600,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

Zone 10 is a Lambert conformal conic projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having standard parallels at north latitude 51 degrees 50 minutes and 53 degrees 50 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 176 degrees 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 51 degrees 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 3,000,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

The zones of the Alaska Coordinate System of 1983 have the following characteristics:

Zone 1 is an oblique Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having an origin at the intersection of parallel 57° 00 minutes north latitude and meridian 133° 40 minutes west of Greenwich, at which the scale is set one part in 10,000 too small, and through which the axis of symmetry is in geodetic azimuth arc tangent-3/4, reckoned clockwise from south. The origin is assigned values such that all final coordinates will be positive.

Zone 2 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 142° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 142° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel of 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 3 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 146° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 146° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 4 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 150° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 150° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 5 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 154° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 154° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 6 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 158° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 158° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 7 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 162° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 162° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 8 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 166° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 166° west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 9 is a transverse Mercator projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having a central meridian 170° 00 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in 10,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 170° 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 54° 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

Zone 10 is a Lambert conformal conic projection of the World Reference Ellipsoid, having standard parallels at north latitude 51 degrees 50 minutes and 53 degrees 50 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 176 degrees 00 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 51 degrees 00 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 1,000,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am §§ 58, 59 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 13, 14 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Sec. 38.20.070.
Position of system.

The position of the Alaska Coordinate System of 1927 shall be as marked on the ground by triangulation or traverse stations established in conformity with the standards adopted by the National Geodetic Survey, National Ocean Service whose geodetic positions have been rigidly adjusted on the North American datum of 1927 and whose coordinates have been computed on the system defined in this chapter.

The position of the Alaska Coordinate System of 1983 shall be as marked on the ground by triangulation or traverse stations established in conformity with the standards adopted by the National Geodetic Survey, National Ocean Service whose geodetic positions have been rigidly adjusted on the North American datum of 1983 and whose plane coordinates have been computed on the system defined in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am §§ 60, 61 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Sec. 38.20.080.
Limitation.

Coordinates based on the Alaska Coordinate System, purporting to define the position of a point on a land boundary, may not be presented to be recorded in any public land records or deed records unless the point is within two miles of a horizontal control station established in conformity with National Geodetic Survey, National Ocean Service standards and specifications for first-order, second-order, or third-order work.
The two-mile limitation may be modified by a state agency to meet local conditions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am § 62 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Sec. 38.20.090.
Use of system name.

The use of the term “Alaska Coordinate System of 1927” on a map, report of survey, or other document is limited to coordinates based on the Alaska Coordinate System of 1927 as defined in this chapter.

The use of the term “Alaska Coordinate System of 1983” on a map, report of survey, or other document is limited to coordinates based on the Alaska Coordinate System of 1983 as defined in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am §§ 63, 64 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Sec. 38.20.100.
Use of public land survey descriptions.

When coordinates based on the Alaska Coordinate System of 1927 or the Alaska Coordinate System of 1983 are used to describe a tract of land which in the same document is also described by reference to a subdivision, line, or corner of the United States public land surveys, the description by coordinates shall be construed as supplemental to the basic description of the subdivision, line, or corner contained in the official plats and field notes recorded, and in the event of a conflict the description by reference to the subdivision, line, or corner of the United States public land surveys prevails over the description by coordinates.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am § 65 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 38.20.110.
Use of system not required.

Nothing in this chapter requires a purchaser or mortgagee to rely on a description, any part of which depends exclusively upon the Alaska Coordinate System of 1927 or the Alaska Coordinate System of 1983.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1965; am § 66 ch 152 SLA 1984)